Arkansas, session 2025, HB1315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 16, Subchapter 8, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-16-818. Blood type designation.
(a)(1) A person, or the parent or guardian of a person, may apply to
the Office of Driver Services to obtain a blood type designation on a
driver's license or identification card issued under this subchapter by
providing:
(A) A signed form stating the blood type of the person;
and
(B) Payment of the fee for the driver's license or
identification card authorized under this chapter.
(2) If the person seeks a duplicate or substitute driver's
license with the blood type designation and his or her driver's license has
not expired, the fee shall be as provided under § 27-16-806.
(b) The Office of Driver Services may:
*ZRC031*
02-12-2025 10:15:36 ZRC031

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 HB1315
(1) Determine the appropriate placement of the blood type
designation on a driver's license or identification card authorized under
this section; and
(2) Promulgate rules for the administration of this section.
(c) This section does not require a person other than an applicant
under this section to:
(1) Provide his or her blood type to the Office of Driver
Services; or
(2) Have a blood type designation placed on his or her driver's
license or identification card.
(d) An applicant under this section is exclusively responsible for:
(1) The accuracy of information submitted to the Office of
Driver Services; and
(2) Verification of the accuracy of the information placed on
the applicant's driver's license or identification card, including without
limitation the obligation to request an immediate correction if the
information is incorrect.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date. This act is effective on
and after January 1, 2026.

/s/Torres














02-12-2025 10:15:36 ZRC031